Utah statutes.
4-14-9.   Examination requirements for license to act as applicator may be waived through reciprocal agreement.

The department may waive any or all examination requirements specified in rule for a noncommercial, commercial, or private pesticide applicator through a reciprocal agreement with another state whose examination requirements and standards for licensure are substantially similar to those of Utah.

